Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following
purposes:
(1) Operations.................................  $ 109,446,753
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 15,384,563
SECTION 2. There are appropriated to the  Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1, 2023, out  of the General Fund, the following amounts, which are to be dis-
tributed as grants-in-aid, for program costs and to purchase  services, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Early intervention services
and early childhood special
education programs .................. $195,333,054
(2) Other K-12 grant-in-aid
programs................................... $141,506,597
(3) Youth development programs ... $ 15,324,869
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding ORS 327.856, there is appropriated to the  Department of
Education, for the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$147,234,632 for deposit into the High School Graduation and College and  Career Readiness
Fund.
SECTION 4. There is appropriated to  the Department of Education, for the biennium
beginning July 1,  2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $64,206,661 for debt service
on general obligation bonds.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$3,481,660 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for debt service.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses, other than expenses described in sections 7 and 15 of this 2023  Act, from fees,
moneys or other  revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds,
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 1
corporate activity tax funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Department of
Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Capital bonding......................... $242,500,000
(2) Operations................................. $ 50,080,259
(3) Operations - American Rescue
Plan Act .................................... $ 263,351
(4) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 6,959,140
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services from fees, moneys or  other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds,  corporate activity tax funds
and federal funds,  collected or received by the Department of Education for programs other
than those specified in sections 6 and 15 of this 2023 Act, for the following purposes:
(1) Youth development programs ... $ 6,597,025
(2) Youth development programs -
American Rescue Plan Act ....... $ 6,736,649
(3) Educator Advancement
Council...................................... $ 67,928,837
(4) All other grants ........................ $232,768,685
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from federal funds, other than those described in sections 9 and 15 of this 2023
Act, collected or received by the Department of Education, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 81,177,653
(2) Oregon School for the Deaf ...... $ 392,642
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of grants-in-aid,  program costs and purchased services from federal funds, other than those
described in sections 8 and 15 of this  2023 Act, received by the Department of Education, for
the following purposes:
(1) Youth development programs ... $ 1,307,897
(2) K-12 COVID-19 related
grants........................................ $529,705,846
(3) All other grants ........................ $924,429,023
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$940,857,193 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of Ed-
ucation from the Student Investment Account established under ORS 327.175.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$93,270,198 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payments of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services by the Department of Ed-
ucation from the Early Learning Account established under ORS 327.269,  for early inter-
vention services and early childhood special education programs.
SECTION 12.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$437,613,169 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education for a  transfer of corporate activities
tax funds from the  Early Learning Account established under ORS 327.269 to the Department
of Early Learning and Care.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payments
of grants-in-aid, program costs and purchased services  by the Department of Education from
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 2
the Statewide Education Initiatives Account  established under ORS 327.250, for the following
purposes:
(1) High School Graduation and
College and Career
Readiness Fund......................... $162,927,214
(2) Reengagement program ............ $ 8,694,448
(3) All other grants ........................ $247,672,317
SECTION 14.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$42,240,779 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department of Education from the Statewide Education  Initi-
atives Account established under ORS 327.250 for operations.
SECTION 15. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, the following expenditures by the
Department of Education are not limited:
(1) Moneys  from the School Lunch Revolving Account, Education Training Revolving
Account and Common School Fund; and
(2) Expenditures for grants-in-aid and purchased services from federal funds received  by
the Department of Education from the United States Department of Agriculture.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 6 (4), chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for  payment of grants-in-aid, program costs and
purchased services from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds,  corporate activity tax funds and federal funds, collected or re-
ceived by the Department of  Education for programs other than those specified in sections
5 and 14, chapter 603, Oregon Laws 2021, for all other grants, is increased by $1,341,219, for
expenditures from the School Stabilization Subaccount for  Wildfire-impacted School Dis-
tricts.
SECTION 17.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5014 (HB 5014-A) Page 3